test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-tenevasjTS_gt-norm.yaml
  Verb - теневась: # Verb 'to know / tietää' - full paradigm - Type 1, transitive
 #_[4-B-tr]_tyenyewə-_’tietää’_TV_=_paritontavuinen_ə-vartalo_[MDTN-koodit_ə,_yə]
     теневась+V+TV+Ger: [тенева, теневась]
     теневась+V+TV+GerFin: теневаванзь
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+Abs: теневава
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+Abs: теневавам’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+Abs: теневава’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+Abs: теневаван’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+Abs: теневавахана
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+Abs: теневавахад
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+Abs: теневававна
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+Abs: теневаваха’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+Abs: теневаваха’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+Abs: теневаваха’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+Abs: теневава”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+Abs: теневаби
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+Abs: теневаби”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+Abs: теневаваха”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+Abs: теневаваха”на
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+Abs: теневавахат
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+Abs: теневаби”мана
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [теневавав, теневавами]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: [теневавав, теневавами]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [теневаван, теневавани]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: [теневавахан, теневавахани]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [теневаваханан, теневаваханани]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [теневавахадан, теневавахадани, теневавахадни]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [теневававнан, теневававнани]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1: [теневавахаюн, теневавахаюни]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1: [теневавахаюн, теневавахаюни]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1: [теневавахаюн, теневавахаюни]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [теневабин, теневабини]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [теневабин, теневабини]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: [теневаби”н, теневаби”ни]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: [теневаваха”н, теневаваха”ни]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: [теневаваха”нан, теневаваха”нани]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: [теневавахатан, теневавахатани, теневавахатни]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: [теневаби”манан, теневаби”манани]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: теневавар
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: теневавамд
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: теневаванд
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: теневаваханд
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: теневавахананд
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: теневавахаданд
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: теневававнанд
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg2: теневавахаюд
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg2: теневавахаюд
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg2: теневавахают
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: теневабид
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: теневабид
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: теневабит
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: теневавахат
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: теневаваха”нат
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: теневавахатат
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: теневаби”манат
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: теневавада
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: теневавамда
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: теневаванда
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: теневаваханда
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: теневавахананда
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: теневавахаданда
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: теневававнанда
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg3: теневавахаюда
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg3: теневавахаюда
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg3: теневавахаюта
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: теневабида
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: теневабида
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: теневабита
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: теневавахата
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: теневаваха”ната
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: [теневавахатата, теневавахатта]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: теневаби”маната
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: теневавами’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxSg1.2: теневавами
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: теневавами’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxSg1.2: теневавами
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: теневавани’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxSg1.2: теневавани
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: теневавахани’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxSg1.2: теневавахани
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: теневаваханани’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxSg1.2: теневаваханани
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: [теневавахадани’, теневавахадни’]
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxSg1.2: [теневавахадани, теневавахадни]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: теневававнани’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxSg1.2: теневававнани
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu1: теневавахаюни’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxSg1.2: теневавахаюни
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu1: теневавахаюни’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxSg1.2: теневавахаюни
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu1: теневавахаюни’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxSg1.2: теневавахаюни
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: теневабини’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxSg1.2: теневабини
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: теневабини’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxSg1.2: теневабини
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: теневаби”ни’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxSg1.2: теневаби”ни
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: теневаваха”ни’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxSg1.2: теневаваха”ни
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: теневаваха”нани’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxSg1.2: теневаваха”нани
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: [теневавахатани’, теневавахатни’]
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxSg1.2: [теневавахатани, теневавахатни]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: теневаби”манани’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxSg1.2: теневаби”манани
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: теневавари’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: теневавамди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: теневаванди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: теневаваханди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: теневавахананди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: теневавахаданди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: теневававнанди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu2: теневавахаюди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu2: теневавахаюди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu2: теневавахаюти’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: теневабиди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: теневабиди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: теневабити’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: теневавахати’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: теневаваха”нати’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: [теневавахатати’, теневавахатти’]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: теневаби”манати’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: теневавади’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: теневавамди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: теневаванди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: теневаваханди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: теневавахананди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: теневавахаданди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: теневававнанди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxDu3: теневавахаюди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxDu3: теневавахаюди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxDu3: теневавахаюти’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: теневабиди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: теневабиди’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: теневабити’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: теневавахати’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: теневаваха”нати’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: [теневавахатати’, теневавахатти’]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: теневаби”манати’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: теневавава”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: теневавава”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: теневавана”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: теневавахана”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: теневаваханана”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: [теневавахадана”, теневавахадна”]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: теневававнана”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl1: теневавахаюна”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl1: теневавахаюна”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl1: теневавахаюна”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: теневабина”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: теневабина”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: теневаби”на”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: теневаваха”на”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: теневаваха”нана”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: [теневавахатана”, теневавахатна”]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: теневаби”манана”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: теневавара”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: теневавамда”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: теневаванда”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: теневаваханда”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: теневавахананда”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: теневавахаданда”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: теневававнанда”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl2: теневавахаюда”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl2: теневавахаюда”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl2: теневавахаюта”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: теневабида”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: теневабида”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: теневабита”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: теневавахата”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: теневаваха”ната”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: [теневавахатата”, теневавахатта”]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: теневаби”маната”
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: теневавадо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: теневавамдо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: теневавандо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: теневавахандо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: теневаваханандо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: теневавахадандо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: теневававнандо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Nom+PxPl3: теневавахаюдо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Acc+PxPl3: теневавахаюдо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Du+Gen+PxPl3: теневавахаюто’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: теневабидо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: теневабидо’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: теневабито’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: теневавахато’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: теневаваха”нато’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: [теневавахатато’, теневавахатто’]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: теневаби”манато’
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Abs: теневавад
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1: [теневавадав, теневавадув, теневавадами]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg1: [теневавадав, теневавадув, теневавадами]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg1: [теневавадан, теневавадани]
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg2: теневавадар
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg2: теневавадамд
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg2: теневаваданд
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg3: теневавадада
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Acc+PxSg3: теневавадамда
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Gen+PxSg3: теневаваданда
     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxDu1: теневавадами’
#     теневась+V+TV+InfImprf+Pred+Nom+PxSg1.2: теневавадами
